South Dakota, session 2026, HB1102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 59-11-25 be AMENDED:
59-11-25. Except in the case of a bank organized pursuant to § 51A-3-1.1 and a
limited partnership organized pursuant to chapter 48-7, any entity that is required by law
to file an annual report must do so:
(1) In the month representing the first-year anniversary of the entity's formation and
in each same month annually thereafter; or
(2) Beginning in the calendar year after the entity's formation, on or before January
thirty-first, and each January thirty-first thereafter.
At the time of formation, an entity shall indicate on the formation document which
filing date the entity has selected.
An entity that is in good standing with the secretary of state and observes the filing
date set in subdivision (1) may choose to observe the filing date set in subdivision (2) and
an entity that is in good standing with the secretary of state and observes the filing date
set in subdivision (2) may choose to observe the filing date set in subdivision (1), by
submitting to the secretary of state a change-of-filing-date form.
Section 2. This Act is effective beginning January 1, 2027.

26.608.27 2 1102
An Act to reschedule the date for filing certain annual reports.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1102
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1102 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1102 ENROLLED